Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3428
Local team meetings; participants and attendees; requirements; liability; professional disciplinary action; immunity; limitation.

(1) Members of a local team and other individuals in attendance at a local team meeting, including, but not limited to, experts, health care professionals, or other observers:

(a) Shall sign a confidentiality agreement as provided in section 71-3433;

(b) Are bound by all applicable local, state, and federal laws concerning the confidentiality of matters reviewed by the local team, but may discuss confidential matters and share confidential information during such meeting; and

(c) Except as otherwise permitted by law, shall not disclose confidential information outside of the meeting.

(2) A member of a local team or an individual in attendance at a local team meeting shall not be subject to civil or criminal liability or any professional disciplinary action for the sharing or discussion of any confidential matter with the local team during a local team meeting. This immunity does not apply to a local team member or attendee who intentionally or knowingly discloses confidential information in violation of the Overdose Fatality Review Teams Act or any state or federal law.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 85.